ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/uk_UA/hyph_uk_UA.dic
й1с2ню1ю
йс1ню
й1с2ніс
йс1ні
й3с2нила
йс1ни
йсни1л
йс4ни2м.
й1св
й1с2у
й1се
й1сь
й1ск2
1йо
2йос
йо1т
йово1ї
йо1во
й1л
й1т
й3те
й1н
2й2н.
2й3ну
й2ня
й3ни
й1в
йви2з1
й1ви
йвищо1
йви1щ
й1р
й1г
йго1
й1у
й1ж
1й2ма1ну
й1ма
4йме1ну
1ймем
1ймеш
й1к
йко1с
й3ку
йд2
й3да
й1до
1й2де1на
й1ден
й1дж
й1х
й1п
йш4ла
й2шл
й2ш3в
й1ч
йчас1
йщас1
й1щ
2п.
1па.
паці1є3ю
па1ц
паці3є
па1ці
па3стко
пас2т1к
2пан1ця
па2н1ц
па1ро1
пар1ті3ї
па2рт
пар1ті
пар1хі1
1пам
папо3
па1п
1па1ч
2п1ц
пці1ю
п1ці
п2с
п3ст
п3сь
псь1ка
2п1си
по1
3поз
пос2
поста3є
по2л1л
по1л
полі1ї
польсько3
по2ль
поль1с
по2ю
по3т
поні1ю
по1ні
поні1ї
пово1ї
по1во
3повіда1ч
по1ві
пові3да
поро1д
по1ро
пор2в
3поря2д1н
по1ря
по2ї.
по2їт
по3г
поя1ві
по1я
поя1ву
поя3ви
1п2о2д.
3пода2р1с
по1да
4подарства
подарст2
поді2я.
по1ді
поді1я
плас1
1пл2ю
1плі
1пле
2п1ле1ну
пли1с
п2ю1
2пт
пта1ці1
п1та1ц
п1ті
п1те
п1тя
1пти
пти3сті
пти3сти
2п1н
пниц1т
п1ни
про1
проз2
премі3ю
пре1мі
премі3ї
преміє3
пря1с
при1с
1пі.
пі4зна1ва
пі1з2но
пі2ст
3пільство
пі2ль
піль1с
1пі1ю
1пін
піва1є
пі1ва
пі2в1т
1пії
1пі1я
3пі1ки
1пу.
3публікував
пу1бл2
публі1ку1
публіку1в
пус1ки
пуск2
пу1ті
1пу1в
1пує
пу1чи
пе1с
1пе3л
пеля1ці2
пе1ля
пеля1ц
персько3
пе2р1с
пері1ю
пе1рі
пері2я
4перез
пе1ре
пере2д4н
пере3д4нім
перед1ні
пере3д2ньої
перед1нь2о1
пере3дня.
пере4д4ня
пере3д4ни2к.
перед1ни
пере3дни1ка
4педицію
пе1ди
педи1ці
пей3
пейсько3
пей1сь
пе1шті
п2ф
1пи.
3писува1т
пи1с2у
пису1в
пис1ка
писк2
пис1кі
пис1ку
пис1ки
1пи1л
3пиняє
пи1ня
3пинила
пи1ни
пини1л
1пив
пи1й1т
пий2
пи3ш1н
1пич
п1ка
2п1п
2пш
п1ч
п’2
2ш.
1ша
ш1с
1шо
шо1с
шо1во1
2шл
ш1лос
3шля
2шта
2ш1тою
3штова1ни
што1ва
што1ву1
ш3тову1в
3штовує
2ш1тов2х.
3штом
ш1ту.
3штува2в1с
шту1в
2ш1н
шно1с
ш1но
2ш2в
ш3ва
2ш1р
1ші
1шу
шу1ч
1ше
ше1сті
ше3сти.
шек1
ш2м
1ши
шистсько3
шис2т1с
шис1ті
шис1ти
ши1мо1
ш1ка
шку1
ш1ки
1ш1ш
2ч.
1ча.
1чаз
3час1т2ю
ча3сти.
часнос3
час1н
час1но
часно3ї
4часни1ка
час1ни
4часни1кі
чаль1но3
ча2ль
чаль1н
ч1б
ч1ц
1чос
3чолит
чо1л
1чою
чо1во1
1чок
чо1п
2ч1н
чно3сте
ч1но
1чі.
1чін
1чів
чі2я
3чікува1ни
чі1ку
чіку1в
чіє1
1чу
чу1с
чу1ті
чу1те
чу1ч
1че
че1ст
чес1но1
чес1н
3чевидний2
че3ви
чеви2д1н
чевид1ни
черсько3
че2р1с
чем1но1
чем1н
2ч1м
чи2з
1чиц
чис1л
чи1ст
3чис1н
3чили1щ
чи1л
чин1но1
чин1н
1чи1ну
чи2ї.
чи1ї
1чи2м.
3чих
1чий2
2ч1к
2ч1ч
ччи1но1
’2ю
’ї1с
’2їв1
’ї3дя
’1ї2д
’я1ві
’я3ви
’я1ко
’я1кі
’я1ки
’2є.
’2єт
’1єр
’2єм
’2єш
1щ
2щ.
що3д2
що1п
2щ1н
щ1но1
2щус
щено1ї
ще1но
1ґ
